Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,158
Certificate of authority; suspension or revocation; effect.

(1) When the certificate of authority of a health maintenance organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall not, during the period of such suspension, enroll any additional enrollees other than newborn children or other newly acquired dependents of existing enrollees and shall not engage in any advertising or solicitation whatsoever.

(2) When the certificate of authority of a health maintenance organization is revoked, such health maintenance organization shall proceed, immediately following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of such health maintenance organization. It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation whatsoever. The director may, by written order, permit such further operation of the health maintenance organization as he or she finds to be in the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees will be afforded the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing health care coverage.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 67.